California, session 20252026, AB1930.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1798.300 of the Civil Code is amended to read:1798.300. As used in this title, the following definitions apply:(a) “Abortion” has the same meaning as defined in Section 123464 of the Health and Safety Code. (b) “Abusive litigation” means litigation or other legal action to deter, prevent, sanction, or punish a person engaging in legally protected health care activity by either of the following:(1) Filing or prosecuting an action in a state other than California where liability, in whole or part, directly or indirectly, is based on a legally protected health care activity that was legal in the state in which it occurred, including an action in which liability is based on a theory of vicarious, joint, or several liability.(2) Attempting to enforce an order or judgment issued in connection with an action described in paragraph (1) by a party to that action or a person acting on behalf of a party to that action. An action shall be considered to be based on conduct that was legal in the state in which it occurred if a part of an act or omission involved in the course of conduct that forms the basis for liability in the action occurs or is initiated in a state in which the health care was legal, whether or not the act or omission is alleged or included in a pleading or other filing in the lawsuit.(c) “Aggrieved person, provider, or other entity” includes, but is not limited to, a person who resides in California, a business or entity doing business in the state or located in the state, a health care service plan, a health insurer, a person or entity that provided a legally protected health care activity in California, a person who received a legally protected health care activity from a provider licensed in California, a person or entity that is licensed in California to provide a legally protected health care activity, including a provider, clinic, or a person who assisted a person or entity that received or provided a legally protected health care activity in California.(d) “Gender-affirming health care services” and “gender-affirming mental health care services” have the same meaning as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16010.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(e) (1) “Legally protected health care activity” means any of the following:(A) The exercise and enjoyment, or attempted exercise and enjoyment, by a person of rights to reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services secured by the Constitution or laws of California or the provision by a health care service plan contract or a policy, or a certificate of health insurance, that provides for such services.(B) An act or omission undertaken to aid or encourage, or attempt to aid or encourage, a person in the exercise and enjoyment or attempted exercise and enjoyment of rights to reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services secured by the Constitution or laws of California.(C) The provision of reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services by a person duly licensed under the laws of California or the coverage of, and reimbursement for, such services or care by a health care service plan or a health insurer, if the service or care is lawful under the laws of California, regardless of the patient’s location.(2) “Legally protected health care activity” does not include any activity that would be deemed unprofessional conduct or that would violate antidiscrimination laws of California.(f) “Reproductive health care services” means and includes all services, care, or products of a medical, surgical, psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic, mental health, behavioral health, preventative, rehabilitative, supportive, consultative, referral, prescribing, or dispensing nature relating to the human reproductive system provided in accordance with the constitution and laws of this state, whether provided in person or by means of telehealth services which includes, but is not limited to, all services, care, and products relating to pregnancy, the termination of a pregnancy, assisted reproduction, or contraception.SEC. 2. Section 1798.309 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1798.309. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person or entity that is located, headquartered, incorporated, or otherwise conducting business in California and receives, is served with, or is subject to a civil, criminal, or regulatory investigation, subpoena, or summons for information regarding abortion or gender-affirming health care services that are legally protected health care activities secured by the Constitution or laws of California shall not comply with or provide information in response to the investigation, subpoena, or summons unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or all of the following conditions are met:(1) Except for an investigation, subpoena, or summons issued by an agency of the federal government, the investigation, subpoena, or summons contains or is accompanied by an affidavit under penalty of perjury attesting any of the following:(A) It is not related to, and that any information obtained shall not be used in, any investigation or proceeding that seeks to impose civil or criminal liability, professional sanctions, or any other legal consequences upon a person or entity for engaging in any abortion or gender-affirming health care services.(B) It is related to an investigation or proceeding regarding activity that is unlawful under California civil or criminal law, and it identifies the California law under which the activity is unlawful.(C) It is related to an investigation or proceeding regarding activity that is grounds for professional discipline in California, and it identifies the grounds for professional discipline.(2) The person or entity receiving or subject to the investigation, subpoena, or summons regarding abortion or gender-affirming health care services has done both of the following:(A) (i) Provided notice to the Attorney General within seven days of receiving the investigation, subpoena, or summons indicating whether the person or entity intends to comply with or provide information in response to the investigation, subpoena, or summons. The notice shall include a copy of the investigation, subpoena, or summons, and any related materials.(ii) For any person who is a participant in the address confidentiality program administered by the Secretary of State pursuant to Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 6215) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the seven-day notice under this subparagraph shall not commence until the person is in receipt of the investigation, subpoena, or summons that has been forwarded by the Secretary of State.(B) Made reasonable attempts to notify the individual or individuals who provided, sought, received, facilitated, or otherwise engaged in the abortion or gender-affirming health care service to which the investigation, subpoena, or summons pertains at least 30 days prior to providing any responsive information, unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or required by a federal statute or regulation.(3) A minimum of 30 days has passed since the person or entity notified the Attorney General of the investigation, subpoena, or summons pursuant to paragraph (2), unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or required by a federal statute or regulation.(4) Paragraphs (1) through (3), inclusive, shall not apply to any investigation, subpoena, or summons for information regarding abortion or gender-affirming health care services issued by a state agency, commission, department, or office, including, but not limited to, the office of the Attorney General.(b) If a person or entity that is located, headquartered, incorporated, or otherwise conducting business in California receives, is served with, or is subject to a civil, criminal, or regulatory investigation, subpoena, or summons for information regarding abortion or gender-affirming health care services institutes a civil action to protect against compliance with or the providing information in response to the investigation, subpoena, or summons, the Attorney General may intervene in that action.(c) (1) (A) The Attorney General may commence a civil action against any person or entity that submits a false affidavit described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(B) The submission of a false affidavit described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) by a person or entity shall be punishable by a civil penalty of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). The civil penalty shall be in addition to any other penalties or remedies provided by law.(2) The Attorney General may commence an action to enforce the provisions of this section, including, but not limited, to an application or motion for an order enjoining ongoing or subsequent violations of this section. The Attorney General shall not commence an action pursuant to this paragraph unless the Attorney General has reason to believe the defendant or respondent intends to comply or has complied with an investigation, subpoena, or summons regarding abortion or gender-affirming health care services.(A) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Attorney General may seek all available legally and equitable remedies.(B) A court of this state shall assess a statutory penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the first violation and fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each subsequent violation against any person or entity found to have intentionally, knowingly, willingly, or recklessly complied with an investigation, subpoena, or summons for information regarding abortion or gender-affirming health care services in violation of this section. The statutory penalty shall be in addition to any other legal or equitable remedies available at law.(3) Any action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to this section shall be commenced within six years of the date on which the Attorney General received the notice of the investigation, subpoena, or summons at issue.(4) The court shall award court costs and attorney’s fees to the Attorney General in any civil action in which the court imposes any penalty authorized by this section.